Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture  shall establish by rule a grant
program for the purpose of funding:
(a) Upgrades to establishments that are expected to operate under a program of state
inspection authorized by section 2, chapter 6, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session);
(b) Construction of new establishments that are  expected to operate under a program
of state inspection authorized by section 2, chapter  6, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special ses-
sion); and
(c) Expansion of establishments that operate under a program of federal inspection and
plan to increase processing of meat from animals raised in Oregon.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for awarding a grant and a process for applying for a grant;
(b) Shall preferentially award grants to support establishments that prioritize  seasonally
feasible processing of meat from animals raised in Oregon; and
(c) May require  a recipient of a grant to report to the department on the use of grant
funds.
(3) A recipient of  a grant may use grant funds for costs related to the activities described
in subsection (1) of this  section, such as costs of technical assistance and the purchase of
equipment.
SECTION 2.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the State Department of  Agriculture, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$2,000,000 for the purpose specified in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2785 (HB 2785-B) Page 1
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for distribution to Oregon  State University, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $300,000 for the
purpose of  funding upgrades to facilities and equipment at the Clark Meat Science Center
that are consistent with inspection requirements.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2785 (HB 2785-B) Page 2